Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2006
County officers; removal by judicial proceedings; defensive pleadings.

No answer or other pleading after the complaint is necessary, but the defendant may move to reject the complaint upon any ground rendering such motion proper; and he may answer if he desires, and if he answers the accuser may reply or not. But if there be an answer and reply, the provisions of section 23-2003 relating to pleadings in the action shall apply.

R.S.1866, c. 45, § 6, p. 298;

R.S.1913, § 5703;

C.S.1922, § 5033;

C.S.1929, § 26-1706;

R.S.1943, § 23-2006.